Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 10
BEER

Sec.

§ 23-1001. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Beer” means any beverage obtained by the alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of barley, malt and/or other ingredients in drinkable water.

“Brewer” means a person licensed to manufacture beer.

“Certificate of approval” means a license issued to a person whose business is located outside of the state of Idaho who sells beer to wholesalers located within the state of Idaho.

“Contractee brewer” means a brewer producing fewer than thirty thousand (30,000) barrels of beer in aggregate annually, including any beer manufactured outside the state of Idaho, that enters into a contractual relationship with another brewer to produce beer on the contractee’s behalf.

“Contractor brewer” means a brewer producing fewer than thirty thousand (30,000) barrels of beer in aggregate annually, including any beer manufactured outside the state of Idaho, that enters into a contractual relationship with a contractee brewer to produce beer for the contractee brewer on the contractor brewer’s licensed premises.

“Dealer” means a person licensed to import beer into this state for sale to a wholesaler.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho state police.

“Live performance” means a performance occurring in a theater and not otherwise in violation of any provision of Idaho law.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, copartnership, association, corporation or any group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular number unless the intent to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the context.

“Premises” means the building and contiguous property owned, or leased or used under government permit, by a licensee as part of the business establishment in the business of sale of beer at retail, which property is improved to include decks, docks, boardwalks, lawns, gardens, golf courses, ski resorts, courtyards, patios, poolside areas or similar improved appurtenances in which the sale of beer at retail is authorized under the provisions of law.

“Retailer” means a person licensed to sell beer to consumers at premises described in the license.

“Theater” means a room, place or outside structure for performances or readings of dramatic literature, plays or dramatic representations of an art form not in violation of any provision of Idaho law.

“Wholesaler” means any person licensed to sell beer to retailers, wholesalers, permittees or consumers and to distribute beer from warehouse premises described in the license.

All other words and phrases used in this chapter, the definitions of which are not herein given, shall be given their ordinary and commonly understood and acceptable meanings.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 1, p. 312; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 41, p. 811; am. 1976, ch. 123, § 1, p. 472; am. 1987, ch. 200, § 1, p. 421; am. 1989, ch. 291, § 1, p. 718; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 4, p. 320; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 4, p. 20; am. 1995, ch. 311, § 1, p. 1071; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 66, p. 1450; am. 2003, ch. 111, § 3, p. 348; am. 2015, ch. 220, § 1, p. 682; am. 2019, ch. 214, § 1, p. 651.

§ 23-1002. Alcoholic content.

Beer containing not more than six percent (6%) of alcohol by weight may be manufactured, imported and/or sold and distributed in and into this state or possessed therein in the manner and under the conditions prescribed in this act and not otherwise.

Beer containing more than four percent (4%) of alcohol by weight shall be considered and taxed as wine.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 2, p. 312; am. 1988, ch. 301, § 1, p. 957; am. 2015, ch. 244, § 4, p. 1008.

§ 23-1003. Brewers’, dealers’ and wholesalers’ licenses.

Before any brewer shall manufacture or any dealer or wholesaler import or sell beer within the state of Idaho, such brewer shall apply to the director for a license. The application form shall be prescribed and furnished by the director and require that the applicant show that such brewer possesses all the qualifications and none of the disqualifications of a licensee. To determine qualification for a license, the director shall cause an investigation that shall include a fingerprint-based criminal history check of the Idaho central criminal history database and the federal bureau of investigation criminal history database. Each person listed as an applicant on an initial application shall submit a full set of fingerprints and the fee to cover the cost of the criminal history background check with the application. The application shall also be accompanied by the required licensee fee; provided, that where the applicant is or will be within more than one (1) of the foregoing classifications, the applicant shall apply for each classification but shall pay only one (1) license fee, which shall be for the classification requiring the highest fee. If the director is satisfied that the applicant possesses the qualifications and none of the disqualifications for the license, the director shall issue a license for each classification applied for, subject to the restrictions and upon the conditions in this act specified, which license or licenses shall be at all times prominently displayed in the place of business of the licensee.

Each wholesaler shall, in addition to the application, file with the director a notice in writing signed by the dealer or brewer and the wholesaler stating the geographic territory within which the wholesaler will distribute beer to retailers. The territory will be agreed upon between the dealer or brewer and the wholesaler and may not be changed or modified without the consent of both the dealer or brewer and the wholesaler. Provided however, nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit a brewer or dealer from permitting more than one (1) distributor for the same geographic territory.

In the event that a wholesaler sells beer to a retailer who is located outside the geographical territory designated by that wholesaler on the notice provided for in subsection (b) of this section, the dealer or wholesaler who has designated the geographical territory in which the sale occurred may apply to a district court of this state for the issuance of an injunction enjoining sales of beer by the wholesaler outside of its designated geographical territory. The procedure for issuance of an injunction pursuant to this act shall be subject to the Idaho rules of civil procedure. Upon proof to the court that a wholesaler has made a sale of beer outside of its designated geographical territory, the court shall issue an injunction directed to the wholesaler prohibiting sales of beer outside of its designated geographical territory.

Any brewer licensed within the state of Idaho who produces fewer than thirty thousand (30,000) barrels of beer annually, upon payment of a retailer’s annual license fee, may be issued a brewer’s retail beer license for the retail sale of the products of its brewery at its licensed premises or one (1) remote retail location, or both. Any brewer selling beer at retail or selling to a retailer must pay the taxes required in section 23-1008, Idaho Code, but need not be licensed as a wholesaler for the purpose of selling beer at the brewery or at one (1) remote retail location.

Any brewer licensed within the state of Idaho who produces fewer than thirty thousand (30,000) barrels of beer annually may be issued a brewer’s pub license. Upon payment of a retailer’s annual license fee, and subject to the fees in sections 23-1015 and 23-1016, Idaho Code, a brewer may, at its licensed brewery or at one (1) remote retail location, or both, sell at retail the products of any brewery by the individual bottle, can or glass. Any brewer selling beer at retail or selling products of its brewery to a retailer must pay the taxes required in section 23-1008, Idaho Code, on the products of its brewery, but need not be licensed as a wholesaler for the purpose of selling beer at the brewery or at one (1) remote retail location.

A brewer licensed under the provisions of subsection (d) or (e) of this section may be licensed as a wholesaler for the sale of beer produced by such brewery to retailers other than at the licensed brewery and one (1) remote retail location and shall not be required to pay an additional fee. Such brewer shall, however, comply with and be subject to all other regulations or provisions of law that apply to a wholesaler’s license, except as the laws may restrict sales at the licensed brewery or one (1) other remote retail location. The holder of a brew pub license shall not be disqualified from holding a retail wine license or wine by the drink license for the sale of wine at the brew pub premises on the grounds that the licensee is also licensed as a wholesaler.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 3, as added by 1943, ch. 167, § 2, p. 349; am. 1972, ch. 370, § 1, p. 1087; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 42, p. 811; am. 1987, ch. 22, § 1, p. 29; am. 1989, ch. 290, § 1, p. 716; am. 2001, ch. 284, § 2, p. 1014; am. 2013, ch. 187, § 2, p. 447; am. 2014, ch. 97, § 5, p. 265; am. 2015, ch. 220, § 2, p. 682.

§ 23-1004. Dealers’ license fee.

Every dealer for whom no license fee is elsewhere provided in this act shall, except as provided in section 23-1003[, Idaho Code], pay to the state of Idaho an annual license fee of one hundred dollars ($100), and a like amount for each separate warehouse used for the purpose of, or in connection with, the importing of beer into this state.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 3-a, as added by 1943, ch. 167, § 2, p. 349.

§ 23-1005. Qualifications of licensees.

No license shall issue to an applicant for a dealer’s or wholesaler’s license unless the applicant is authorized to do business within the state of Idaho; nor shall such license be issued to an applicant whose license, or the license of any partner, has been revoked within two (2) years; nor to an applicant who, or if a partnership any partner of whom, has been convicted of any violation of any law of Idaho or of the United States regulating, governing, or prohibiting the sale of alcoholic beverages or intoxicating liquor. Any such license issued shall be revoked if the licensee ceases to have the qualifications, or acquires the disqualifications, in this section provided.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 3-b, as added by 1943, ch. 167, § 2, p. 349; am. 1992, ch. 315, § 2, p. 937; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 8, p. 20.

§ 23-1005A. Transfer of license — Fee — Application for approval.

No brewer, dealer or wholesaler of beer license issued pursuant to section 23-1003, Idaho Code, or any beer retailer license issued pursuant to section 23-1010, Idaho Code, may be transferred to another person, including an executor, administrator, or trustee in bankruptcy of the estate of the licensee, unless the transferee shall first have obtained the approval of the director to such transfer upon application containing substantially the same information required of an applicant for a brewer’s, dealer’s, wholesaler’s or retailer’s beer license, as the case may be. If the transferee possesses all the qualifications and none of the disqualifications for such license, the director shall approve the transfer by issuing a license to the transferee. The fee for each transfer of a brewer’s, dealer’s, wholesaler’s or retailer’s beer license shall be twenty dollars ($20.00), which fee shall accompany the application for transfer.

Application for a transfer of any beer license from one location to another shall be made to the director on forms prescribed and furnished by the director. The director shall approve such transfer upon submission of the application and receipt by the director of a transfer fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

The director, in his discretion, may deny the transfer of a license during the pendancy [pendency] of any proceedings for suspension or revocation instituted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1005A, as added by 1979, ch. 137, § 1, p. 433; am. 1991, ch. 28, § 2, p. 54.

§ 23-1006. Records and returns of licensees — Investigations and examinations.

Every licensed dealer, brewer and wholesaler shall have, and notify the director of, a place of business within the state of Idaho where such licensee will and shall keep a record of his or its imports into, and sales of beer within, the state, including the date, quantity, from whom purchased for import, the carrier or other person or means by whom or which transported for import, and the name and address of the vendee, and shall so keep such record of each such sale or import for a period of four (4) years thereafter. Such licensee shall, on or before the 15th day of each month, make a return to the director of the amount of beer sold in, and imported by him into, the state of Idaho for the preceding month, which shall be upon forms furnished by the director. The director may require such additional information to be included in such returns as shall assist him in determining whether or not such licensee is complying with, or violating, this act and whether or not all taxes and license fees provided for by this act are being fully paid. The director shall have the right at any time to make an examination of each dealer’s, brewer’s and wholesaler’s books, records and premises, make an inventory and otherwise check the accuracy of such returns, and investigate for any violation of this act, and file, and retain in his office for not less than two (2) years, a report thereof. An application for, and acceptance of a license by, a dealer, brewer, wholesaler or retailer shall constitute consent to, and be authority for, entry by the director, or his authorized agents, upon any premises related to the licensee’s business, or wherein are, or should be, kept, any of the licensee’s books, records, supplies or other property related to said business, and to make the inventory, check and investigations aforesaid with relation to said licensee or any other licensee.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 3-c, as added by 1943, ch. 167, § 2, p. 349; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 43, p. 811; am. 1984, ch. 104, § 1, p. 242; am. 1999, ch. 129, § 1, p. 373; am. 2000, ch. 333, § 1, p. 1123.

§ 23-1007. Sales by dealers and wholesalers — Prohibited unless obtained from licensees — Consumption on premises prohibited — Minimum sale on licensed premises of unbroken packages or kegs.

Except as provided in section 23-1007A, Idaho Code, it shall be unlawful for any dealer or wholesaler to sell for use within the state of Idaho any unbroken packages or kegs of beer produced, manufactured, imported or bought by such dealer except to licensed dealers, wholesalers, retailers to whom a license has been issued by the director, or to employees of the wholesaler or dealer; nor shall any dealer or wholesaler allow for a consideration such beer to be consumed upon the premises of such dealer or wholesaler; provided, however, that any dealer or wholesaler shall be allowed to make sales of beer in kegs of not less than five (5) gallons to a consumer at his licensed premises. Licensed brewers may sell at retail only as provided in section 23-1003(d) and (e), Idaho Code.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 3-d, as added by 1943, ch. 167, § 2, p. 349; am. 1965, ch. 292, § 1, p. 778; am. 1982, ch. 307, § 1, p. 772; am. 1987, ch. 22, § 2, p. 29; am. 1991, ch. 279, § 1, p. 721; am. 2013, ch. 95, § 1, p. 232.

§ 23-1007A. Beer sold or donated for benevolent, charitable or public purposes — Permit required.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23-1007, Idaho Code, to the contrary, nothing shall prevent any licensed dealer, wholesaler or retailer from selling or donating unbroken packages of beer or kegs of beer to a person which has not been issued any license for the sale of alcoholic beverages in this state, for benevolent, charitable or public purposes if a permit has been issued to the person or nonprofit entity as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Upon application to the director of the Idaho state police, the director may issue a permit authorizing the sale or dispensing of beer by a person if the director is satisfied that the proceeds, after deducting reasonable expenses incurred, will be donated for a benevolent, charitable or public purpose. The director shall prescribe the form of the application which may require:

Disclosure of names of sponsors;

Quantities and types of beer products to be used at the event;

Names of the dealer or wholesaler from whom the beer is to be received;

The retailer, if any, designated by such person or nonprofit entity to receive, store or dispense beer on behalf of the permittee;

Dates and hours during which the permit is to be effective, not to exceed three (3) consecutive days;

That the applicant submit a report to the director subsequent to the benevolent, charitable or public purpose event showing the disposition of funds from the event; and

Such other information directly related to the event and the applicant that the director may require.

Should the director determine that an applicant, permittee or its representative is violating or has in the past violated any law pertaining to the dispensing or sale of beer by a licensed retailer relating to hours of sale, relating to restrictions concerning age provided in section 23-1013, Idaho Code, or has failed in the past to submit such information as may have been requested by the director, such permit may be summarily suspended by the director prior to hearing, or may be denied or cancelled pending a hearing.

A licensed retailer may, on behalf of the permittee, receive or store beer to be used at the event and may dispense such beer to attendees of the benevolent, charitable or public purpose event for which the permit was issued.

The director shall collect a twenty dollar ($20.00) fee for each permit issued.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1007A, as added by 1991, ch. 279, § 2, p. 721; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 67, p. 1450.

§ 23-1008. Tax — Distribution — Rules — Reports.

A tax of four dollars and sixty-five cents ($4.65) per barrel of thirty-one (31) gallons, and a like rate for any other quantity or fraction thereof, is hereby levied and imposed upon each and every barrel of beer sold for use within the state of Idaho.

The revenues received from the taxes, interest, penalties, or deficiency payments imposed by this section shall be distributed as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by law to be paid by the state tax commission shall be paid through the state refund account and those moneys are continuously appropriated.

The balance remaining after distributing the amount in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be distributed as follows:

Twenty percent (20%) shall be distributed to the substance abuse treatment fund which is created in section 23-408, Idaho Code;

Thirty-three percent (33%) shall be distributed to the permanent building fund; and

The remainder shall be distributed to the general fund.

The commission is empowered to prescribe rules:

For reports by carriers for hire and also all other carriers owned and/or employed, directly or indirectly, by out-of-state brewers, dealers or other persons, of all deliveries of beer in and into the state of Idaho, stating especially the origin and destination of the beer, the quantity thereof, and also the names and addresses, respectively, of the consignors and consignees.

For reports by out-of-state brewers and manufacturers of beer, of all shipments by them of beer into the state of Idaho, stating especially the matters mentioned in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
History.

Any wholesaler who shall sell beer, upon which the tax herein imposed has not been paid and any person who shall purchase, receive, transport, store or sell any beer upon which the tax herein imposed has not been paid, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and any beer so purchased, received, transported, stored or possessed or sold shall be subject to seizure by the commission, any inspector or investigator of the commission, or by any sheriff, constable or other police officer, and the same may be removed and kept for evidence. Upon conviction of any person for violation of the provisions of this section, the said beer, and all barrels, kegs, cases, cartons and cans containing the same shall be forfeited to the state of Idaho, and, in addition, the person so convicted shall be subject to the other penalties in this chapter prescribed.

Beer and all barrels, kegs, cases, cartons or cans so forfeited to the state of Idaho shall be sold by the commission at public auction to any brewer, wholesaler or retailer, licensed under the provisions of this chapter, making the highest bid. Such sale shall be held at such place and time as may be designated by the commission after reasonable notice thereof given in such manner and for such time as the commission may by rule prescribe. From the purchase price received upon such sale, the commission shall first deduct an amount sufficient to pay the tax due on such beer, and to pay all costs incurred in connection with such sale. The commission shall deposit the balance remaining with the state treasurer, who shall place the same in the general fund of the state of Idaho, and it shall become a part thereof.

1935, ch. 132, § 4, p. 312; am. 1949, ch. 192, § 1, p. 462; am. 1949, ch. 281, § 1, p. 575; am. 1961, ch. 43, § 3, p. 66; am. 1980, ch. 239, § 1, p. 554; am. 1980, ch. 391, § 1, p. 993; am. 1986, ch. 73, § 3, p. 201; am. 1987, ch. 260, § 2, p. 545; am. 2007, ch. 141, § 5, p. 407; am. 2013, ch. 10, § 1, p. 20.

§ 23-1009. Retailers’ local licenses.

No retailer shall sell beer within this state, until he or it shall be licensed therefor by a municipality, if the business is to be conducted therein, and by the county wherein said business is to be conducted, and by the director. Applications for retailer’s licenses shall be made under oath first to the director of the Idaho state police, and if the license be issued, to the county and then to the municipality, upon forms to be supplied by each, which forms shall require that the applicant show that the applicant possesses all of the qualifications and none of the disqualifications of a retailer licensee under this act, and, as to the municipal license, under any ordinance thereof. Each application shall be accompanied with the required license fee. If the applications conform hereto the director, county and municipality respectively, shall each issue a retailer’s license to the applicant, subject to the restrictions and upon the conditions in this act specified, and, as to the municipal license, in the ordinance aforesaid. Said licenses shall at all times be prominently displayed in the place of business of the licensee, and shall be issued only for the particular premises described therein, but the municipality, county and director may permit a transfer to other particularly described premises. No license transferred by process of law or otherwise shall authorize the transferee, including any executor, administrator or trustee in bankruptcy of the estate of the licensee, to retail beer thereunder until the transferee shall have filed under oath applications therefor containing substantially the same information required of an applicant for a license, and if the transferee possesses the qualifications and none of the disqualifications for a license as herein provided, the director, county and municipality shall approve such transfer and issue a license so to show. The transferee shall accompany the state application for transfer with, and shall pay, the fee as set out in section 23-1005A, Idaho Code. Such transferee shall accompany each such county and municipality application for transfer with, and shall pay, the sum of five dollars ($5.00).

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 5, as added by 1943, ch. 167, § 4, p. 349; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 44, p. 811; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 5, p. 320; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 68, p. 1450.

§ 23-1010. License to sell beer at retail — Application procedure and form — Showing of eligibility for license and disqualifications.

Every person who shall apply for a state license to sell beer at retail shall tender the license fee to, and file written application for license with, the director. The application shall be on a form prescribed by the director that shall require such information concerning the applicant, the premises for which license is sought and the business to be conducted thereon by the applicant as the director may deem necessary or advisable, and which shall enable the director to determine that the applicant is eligible and has none of the disqualifications for license, as provided for in this section. If the applicant is applying for a license solely for a theater that is presenting live performances as those terms are defined in section 23-1001, Idaho Code, or a movie theater, as defined in section 23-944, Idaho Code, built prior to January 1, 1950, and listed on the national register of historic places, the application shall so state. Such information shall include the following:

The name and place of residence of the applicant and length of his residence within the state of Idaho and, if the applicant is a partnership, the names, places of residence and lengths of residence within the state of Idaho of each partner and, if the applicant is a corporation or association, the date and place of incorporation or organization, the location of its principal place of business in Idaho and the names and places of residence of its officers, directors or members of its governing board and of the person who manages or will manage the business of selling beer at retail;

The particular place for which the license is desired, designating the same by a street and number, if practicable, or by such other apt description as definitely locates such place, and the name of the owner of the premises for which license is sought;

The application shall affirmatively show:

That the applicant is the bona fide owner of the business that will be engaged in the sale of beer at retail and with respect to which license is sought;

That the condition of the place or building wherein it is proposed to sell beer at retail conforms to all laws and rules of the state of Idaho and to the ordinances of the county and municipality applicable thereto relating to public health and safety and to the zoning ordinances of the municipality applicable thereto;

That there is no stamp or permit outstanding and in force that has been issued to any person by the United States government for the premises for which license to sell beer at retail is sought, which stamp or permit denotes payment of any special tax imposed by the United States government on a retail dealer in liquor or wines, unless said premises are premises for which a retail license for sale of liquor by the drink, issued under the provisions of chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code, is in force and effect;

That the individual applicant, or each partner of a partnership applicant, or a corporation applicant or an association applicant is qualified to do business within the state of Idaho;

That the applicant, if an individual, is not less than nineteen (19) years of age;

That, within three (3) years immediately preceding the date of filing the application, the applicant has not been convicted of the violation of any law of the state of Idaho, any other state, or of the United States regulating, governing or prohibiting the sale, manufacture, transportation or possession of alcoholic beverages or intoxicating liquors, or, within said time, suffered the forfeiture of a bond for failure to appear in answer to charges of any such violation;

That, within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of filing the application, the applicant has not been convicted of any felony or paid any fine or completed any sentence of confinement therefor within said time;

That, within three (3) years next preceding the date of filing said application, the applicant has not had any license provided for herein, or any license or permit issued to the applicant pursuant to the law of this state, or any other state, or of the United States to sell, manufacture, transport or possess alcoholic beverages or intoxicating liquors, revoked.

To determine qualification for a license, the director shall also cause an investigation that shall include a fingerprint-based criminal history check of the Idaho central criminal history database and the federal bureau of investigation criminal history database. Each person listed as an applicant on an initial application shall submit a full set of fingerprints and the fee to cover the cost of the criminal history background check for such person with the application.

The affirmative showing required with respect to an applicant under paragraphs (e), (f), (g) and (h) of subsection (2) of this section shall also be required to be made with respect to each partner of a partnership applicant and to each incumbent officer, director or member of the governing board of a corporation or association applicant.

The application must be subscribed and sworn to by the individual applicant, or by a partner of a partnership applicant, or by an officer or manager of a corporation or association applicant, before a notary public or other person authorized by law to administer oaths.

If an applicant shall be unable to make any affirmative showing required in this section or if an application shall contain a false material statement, knowingly made, the same shall constitute a disqualification for license and license shall be refused. If license is received on any application containing a false material statement, knowingly made, such license shall be revoked. If at any time during the period for which license is issued, a licensee becomes unable to make the affirmative showings required by this section, license shall be revoked, or, if disqualification can be removed, the license shall be suspended until the same shall be removed. The procedure to be followed upon refusal, revocation or suspension of license as herein provided for shall be in accordance with the procedure set forth in this act.

All licenses shall expire at 1:00 a.m. on the first day of the renewal month, which shall be determined by the director by administrative rule and shall be subject to annual renewal upon proper application. The director will determine the renewal month by county based on the number of current licenses within each county, distributing renewals throughout the licensing year. The director may adjust the renewal month to accommodate population increases. Each licensee will be issued a temporary license to operate until the renewal month has been determined. Thereafter, renewals will occur annually on their renewal month. Renewal applications for licenses accompanied by the required fee must be filed with the director on or before the first day of the designated renewal month. Any licensee holding a valid license who fails to file an application for renewal of the current license on or before the first day of the designated renewal month shall have a grace period of an additional thirty-one (31) days in which to file an application for renewal of the license. The licensee shall not be permitted to sell beer at retail during the thirty-one (31) day extended time period unless and until the license is renewed.
History.

I.C.,§ 23-1010, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 2, p. 543; am. 1972, ch. 332, § 4, p. 834; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 45, p. 811; am. 1976, ch. 156, § 1, p. 555; am. 1978, ch. 304, § 1, p. 762; am. 1981, ch. 52, § 1, p. 78; am. 1983, ch. 159, § 1, p. 458; am. 1992, ch. 315, § 3, p. 937; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 6, p. 20; am 2001, ch. 30, § 2, p. 43; am. 2001, ch. 284, § 3, p. 1014; am. 2003, ch. 111, § 4, p. 348; am. 2019, ch. 87, § 2, p. 212.

§ 23-1010A. Prohibited acts — Misdemeanors

Revocation. [Repealed.]

§ 23-1011. Issuance of licenses.

Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 10, title 23, Idaho Code, all applications for retail sale of beer licenses, renewals, or transfers thereof, shall be first presented to the director of the Idaho state police for approval and issuance of the state license required by state law. If the license, renewal or transfer thereof is approved by the director, then such license, renewal or transfer thereof may be issued by the city or county, or both, as the case may be. Approval of such license, renewal or transfer thereof may be by endorsement upon the state license or by the issuance of an additional license, at the option of the city or county.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1011, as added by 1976, ch. 165, § 1, p. 595; am. 1983, ch. 50, § 1, p. 120; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 6, p. 320; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 69, p. 1450.

§ 23-1011A. Officers may examine premises.

The director or his duly authorized representative, the sheriff of any county, or any other police officer, shall have the right at any time to make an examination of the premises of any licensee as to whether the laws of the state of Idaho, the rules and regulations of the director, and the ordinances of any city or county are being complied with.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1011, as added by 1976, ch. 236, § 1, p. 829; am. and redesig. 1983, ch. 50, § 2, p. 120.

§ 23-1011B. Bars or taverns not allowed near churches or schools — Exceptions.

No license shall be issued for any place where beer is sold or dispensed to be consumed on the premises, whether conducted for pleasure or profit, that is within three hundred (300) feet of any public school, church, or any other place of worship measured in a straight line to the nearest entrance to the licensed premises, except with the approval of the governing body of the municipality; provided that this limitation shall not apply to any duly licensed premises that at the time of licensing did not come within the restricted area but subsequent to licensing came therein.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1011B, as added by 1978, ch. 349, § 1, p. 913.

§ 23-1012. Hours of sale.

It shall be unlawful and a misdemeanor for any person in any place licensed to sell beer or where beer is sold or dispensed to be consumed on the premises, whether conducted for pleasure or profit, to sell, dispense or give away beer between the hours of one (1) o’clock A.M. and six (6) o’clock A.M.

Any patron present on the licensed premises after the sale of beer has stopped as provided in subsections (1) and (4) herein shall have a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty (30) minutes, to consume any beverage already served.

Any person who consumes or intentionally permits the consumption of any alcoholic beverage upon the licensed premises after the time provided for in subsection (2) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A county or city may, however, extend, until two (2) o’clock A.M., the hours of the sale of beer.

History.

1943, ch. 167, § 5, p. 349; am. 1978, ch. 39, § 1, p. 68; am. 1987, ch. 110, § 2, p. 222; am. 1987, ch. 351, § 1, p. 780; am. 2003, ch. 284, § 2, p. 769.

§ 23-1013. Restrictions concerning age.

Any person who is nineteen (19) years of age or older may sell, serve, possess or dispense beer in the course of his employment, otherwise it shall be unlawful for any person to sell, serve or dispense beer to or by any person under twenty-one (21) years of age, proof of which, shall be a validly issued state, district, territorial, possession, provincial, national or other equivalent government driver’s license, identification card or military identification card bearing a photograph and date of birth, or a valid passport.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1013, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 4, p. 543; am. 1967, ch. 19, § 1, p. 37; am. 1972, ch. 332, § 5, p. 834; am. 1975, ch. 179, § 2, p. 485; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 10, p. 448; am. 1991, ch. 269, § 2, p. 660.

§ 23-1014. License fees.

Every person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall pay to the state of Idaho an annual license fee according to the following schedule:

Brewer annually producing Fee

Under 10,000 gallons ............................... $ 50.00

10,000 to 100,000 gallons ............................... $100.00

100,000 to 930,000 gallons ............................... $200.00

930,000 gallons or more ............................... $500.00

Wholesaler

For each separate warehouse used for the purpose

Dealer ............................... $100.00

Retailer

For each store from which beer is retailed ............................... $ 50.00

For each store from which a licensed retailer

A like amount shall be paid for each separate brewery operated by the licensee.

of wholesaling or dispensing beer ............................... $300.00

sells keg beer for consumption off premises ............................... $ 20.00

Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed to prohibit municipalities or counties from licensing and regulating places of business where beer is sold to the consumer.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1014, as added by 1987, ch. 91, § 2, p. 172; am. 1994, ch. 13, § 1, p. 20.